North Carolina, session 2025, SB561.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:

PART I. TITLE
SECTION 1.1. This act shall be known and may be cited as "The Working Hearts,
Empowered Homes Act."

PART II. DEFINITIONS
SECTION 2.1. The following definitions apply in this act:
(1) Integrated family support services. – Programs and services administered at
the State level that are designed to strengthen families through the provision
of State-funded or State-subsidized child care, nutritional assistance,
healthcare, or preventive care.
(2) Preventive care. – Healthcare services and activities aimed at reducing
long-term healthcare costs and improving an individual's overall well-being.
(3) Working families. – Households with one or more adults who are engaged in
employment but require support services to maintain economic stability.

PART III. PROGRAM INTEGRATION

STATEWIDE FAMILY SUPPORT COORDINATION SYSTEM
SECTION 3.1.(a) The Department of Health and Human Services shall coordinate
all family support contracts and activities across divisions. This coordination shall address
*S561-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
duplication, cost efficiency, and effectiveness and shall ensure compliance with federal
requirements while maximizing State and federal resources.
SECTION 3.1.(b) The Department of Health and Human Services shall develop a
family support coordination system that integrates family support programs, services, and
activities offered throughout the State to ensure streamlined access for working families. This
system shall consolidate application processes, eligibility requirements, and service delivery
methods for family support programs and services.

FAMILY SUPPORT REGIONAL HUBS PILOT PROGRAM
SECTION 3.2.(a) Program Purpose and Funding. – Effective July 1, 2025, there is
appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of Health and Human Services the sum
of three million dollars ($3,000,000) in nonrecurring funds for each year of the 2025-2027 fiscal
biennium to establish and administer a Regional Hubs Pilot Program (Pilot Program) in up to
three different regions of the State. The purpose of this Pilot Program is to evaluate the
effectiveness of utilizing regional hubs that are available in person, through the World Wide
Web, or through any other means of electronic access to assist working families with gaining
access to family support programs and services in one setting. The Pilot Program authorized by
this section shall terminate upon the filing of the report required by subsection (b) of this section.
SECTION 3.2.(b) Eligible Use of Funds. – The Department may use the funds
appropriated by subsection (a) of this section to enter into a contract with a third-party entity to
assist with the design, implementation, and operation of these regional hubs.
SECTION 3.2.(c) Reporting. – By February 1, 2028, the Department of Health and
Human Services shall conduct and submit to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on
Health and Human Services and the Fiscal Research Division a comprehensive evaluation of the
Pilot Program authorized by this section. The evaluation shall include, at a minimum, all of the
following information:
(1) A detailed breakdown of Pilot Program expenditures.
(2) A description of the design and operation of each regional hub.
(3) The number of counties and individuals served by each regional hub.
(4) A recommendation as to whether the Pilot Program should be implemented
statewide.

PART IV. SERVICE EXPANSION

CHILD CARE INNOVATION PILOT PROGRAM
SECTION 4.1.(a) Program Purpose and Funding. – Effective July 1, 2025, there is
appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of Health and Human Services, Division
of Child Development and Early Education (DCDEE), the sum of seven million dollars
($7,000,000) in nonrecurring funds for each year of the 2025–2027 fiscal biennium to establish
and administer a Child Care Innovation Pilot Program (Pilot Program). The purpose of the Pilot
Program is to evaluate the effectiveness of targeted child care interventions in improving access
for working families, especially those employed in industries with nontraditional work hours or
employed by small businesses. Upon the filing of the report required by subsection (c) of this
section, the Pilot Program terminates.
SECTION 4.1.(b) Eligible Use of Funds. – The DCDEE shall not use the funds
appropriated by subsection (a) of this section for any purpose other than to do one or more of the
following:
(1) To award grants on a competitive basis to small and midsize nonprofit
employers that establish or contract for on-site or near-site child care services
for their employees. The amount of any competitive grant will be limited to
the amount necessary to match the employer's expenses for these on-site or
Page 2 Senate Bill 561-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
near-site child care services. The DCDEE shall develop an application
process, eligibility criteria, and selection criteria for the competitive grants
authorized by this section.
(2) To award directed grants of up to one thousand dollars ($1,000) each on a first
come, first serve basis to nonprofit or faith-based child care centers located in
rural or underserved communities to expand their child caring capacity or
extend their hours of operation. The DCDEE shall develop an application
process, eligibility criteria, and selection criteria for the microgrants
authorized by this section.
(3) To fund smaller, innovative child care pilot projects in up to five counties
determined by the Department to have the greatest need for expanded access
to child care, based on child care availability and economic data.
SECTION 4.1.(c) Report. – By February 1, 2028, the DCDEE shall report to the Joint
Legislative Oversight Committee on Health and Human Services and the Fiscal Research
Division on the outcomes of the Pilot Program authorized by this section. The report shall
include at least all of the following:
(1) An itemized list of expenditures.
(2) For any grants awarded under this section:
a. The identity and a brief description of each grantee and each program
or service offered by the grantee.
b. The amount of funding awarded to each grantee.
c. The number of individuals served by each grantee and, for the
individuals served, the types of services provided to each.
d. Any other information requested by the Office of Rural Health as
necessary for evaluating the success of the Community Health Grant
Program.
(3) An evaluation of the outcomes and cost-effectiveness of the Pilot Program.
(4) Any other information the DCDEE believes to be necessary for evaluating the
success of the Pilot Program.

NUTRITION ASSISTANCE PILOT PROGRAM
SECTION 4.2.(a) Program Purpose and Funding. – Effective July 1, 2025, there is
appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of Health and Human Services, Division
of Child and Family Well-Being (DCFW), the sum of five million dollars ($5,000,000) in
nonrecurring funds for each year of the 2025–2027 fiscal biennium to establish the Targeted
Food Access Pilot Program (Pilot Program). The purpose of this Pilot Program is to improve
food security and nutritional outcomes for working families through targeted, community-based
strategies. The Pilot Program authorized by this section shall terminate upon the filing of the
report required by subsection (c) of this section.
SECTION 4.2.(b) Eligible Use of Funds. – The DCFW shall not use the funds
appropriated by subsection (a) of this section for any purpose other than to do one or more of the
following:
(1) To support produce prescription programs administered in partnership with
local health clinics or federally qualified health centers, targeting working
families who have at least one family member with a chronic health condition
or that is actively engaged in workforce training. For the purpose of this
subdivision, a produce prescription program is a program in which healthcare
providers prescribe fruits and vegetables to patients at risk for diet-related
health problems or food insecurity, enabling access to healthy produce at low
or no cost.
Senate Bill 561-First Edition Page 3

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(2) To support the establishment or expansion of mobile food markets or food
delivery programs for working families in areas of the State with food deserts,
defined as areas of the State with limited access to affordable, nutritious food
due to a lack of grocery stores or other sources of fresh produce within a
reasonable distance.
(3) To support local partnerships with farmers markets, food co-ops, and
culturally appropriate food providers to improve food security for working
families.
(4) To provide the State contribution necessary to draw down federal matching
funds available through the Food and Nutrition Services Program or nutrition
initiatives supported by the United States Department of Agriculture, or both,
for the activities described in subdivisions (1) through (3) of this subsection.
SECTION 4.2.(c) Report. – By February 1, 2028, the DCFW shall report to the Joint
Legislative Oversight Committee on Health and Human Services and the Fiscal Research
Division on the Pilot Program authorized by this section. The report shall include at least all of
the following information:
(1) An itemized list of expenditures.
(2) The number of people served.
(3) An evaluation of the nutritional impact of the Pilot Program.
(4) An evaluation of the outcomes and cost-effectiveness of the Pilot Program.
(5) Any other information the DCFW believes to be necessary for evaluating the
success of the Pilot Program.

YEAR-ROUND NUTRITION SERVICE PILOT PROGRAM
SECTION 4.3.(a) Program, Purpose. – To the extent funds are made available for
the purpose, the Department of Public Instruction shall establish and administer the Year-Round
Nutrition Service Pilot Program (Program) in accordance with the provisions of this section. The
purpose of the program is to enable select local school administrative units to provide meals to
students at no cost to students through the summer.
SECTION 4.3.(b) Eligibility. – Any local school administrative unit that is or
contains schools that are eligible for and participating in the Community Eligibility Provision
Program is eligible to apply for the Program.
SECTION 4.3.(c) Application. – The Department of Public Instruction shall develop
and release an application for the Program each year. The Department shall notify the local school
administrative units selected to participate in the Program by July 15. The Department shall then
award grants to all selected local school administrative units.
SECTION 4.3.(d) Program Requirements. – Local school administrative units
participating in the Program shall do the following:
(1) Participate in the National School Lunch Program, School Breakfast Program,
and Summer Food Service Program.
(2) Provide two meals per day, breakfast and lunch, to students at no cost to the
students year-round, regardless of the school's instructional calendar.
SECTION 4.3.(e) Report. – No later than January 1 of each year of the Program, the
Department shall report to the Joint Legislative Education Oversight Committee at least the
following information:
(1) The selected local school administrative units and the award to each.
(2) The number of students served through the Program and the number of meals
served.
(3) The number of unfunded applications.
SECTION 4.3.(f) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Public Instruction the sum of five million dollars ($5,000,000) in nonrecurring funds for the
Page 4 Senate Bill 561-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
2025-2026 fiscal year for the Department to establish and administer the Year-Round Nutrition
Service Pilot Program, as enacted by this section.
SECTION 4.3.(g) This section becomes effective July 1, 2025, and applies
beginning with the 2025-2026 school year.

PART V. PREVENTIVE HEALTHCARE AND FAMILY WELL-BEING

PREVENTIVE CARE SERVICES
SECTION 5.1. Effective July 1, 2025, there is appropriated from the General Fund
to the Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Central Management and Support,
Office of Rural Health (ORH), the sum of two million dollars ($2,000,000) in recurring funds for
the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium to be used to provide grants to local health departments, federally
qualified health centers, community health centers, and other safety-net providers to expand
telehealth services in up to ten counties to enable working families to participate in virtual
preventative care services, including wellness checkups, mental health counseling, and pediatric
consultations. In selecting grant recipients, the ORH shall prioritize safety-net providers located
in low-wealth counties.

PARENTAL HEALTH AND FAMILY SUPPORT SERVICES
SECTION 5.2. Effective July 1, 2025, there is appropriated from the General Fund
to the Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Child and Family Well-Being, the
sum of three million dollars ($3,000,000) in recurring funds for each year of the 2025-2027 fiscal
biennium to be used to offer employers with 50 or more employees an incentive to offer on-site
child care and flexible work hours to accommodate working families.

PART VI. FEDERAL MATCHING FUNDS
SECTION 6.1. It is the intent of the General Assembly that the Department of Health
and Human Services and the Department of Public Instruction pursue all available federal
matching funds to supplement State investments in integrated family support services.

PART VII. OVERSIGHT AND ACCOUNTABILITY
SECTION 7.1.(a) Creation of Family Support Advisory Board. – There is
established the Family Support Advisory Board (Advisory Board) within the Department of
Health and Human Services. The Advisory Board shall consist of the following nine members:
(1) The Director of the Division of Child and Family Well-Being or the Director's
designee.
(2) The Secretary of the Department of Public Instruction or a designee.
(3) Two members of the House of Representatives appointed by the Speaker of
the House of Representatives.
(4) Two members of the Senate appointed by the President Pro Tempore of the
Senate.
(5) Three members appointed by the Governor, one of whom shall be a
representative of a community-based organization, one of whom shall be an
expert in healthcare policy, and one of whom shall be an expert in social
services.
SECTION 7.1.(b) Chairperson. – A chairperson shall be elected from among the
members. The chairperson shall organize and direct the work of the Advisory Board.
SECTION 7.1.(c) Administrative Support. – The Department of Health and Human
Services shall provide necessary clerical and administrative support to the Advisory Board.
Senate Bill 561-First Edition Page 5

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 7.1.(d) Meetings. – The Advisory Board shall meet at least quarterly and
at the call of the chairperson. A majority of the Advisory Board constitutes a quorum for the
transaction of business.
SECTION 7.1.(e) Expenses. – Members of the Advisory Board who are State
officers or employees shall receive no compensation for serving on the Advisory Board but may
be reimbursed for their expenses in accordance with G.S. 138-6. Members of the Advisory Board
who are full-time salaried public officers or employees other than State officers or employees
shall receive no compensation for serving on the Advisory Board but may be reimbursed for their
expenses in accordance with G.S. 138-5(b). All other members of the Advisory Board may
receive compensation and reimbursement for expenses in accordance with G.S. 138-5.
SECTION 7.1.(f) Duties. – The Advisory Board shall provide consultation to the
Department of Health and Human Services with respect to the fulfillment of the Department's
responsibilities under Section 3.1 of this act.
SECTION 7.1.(g) Annual Report. – Annually by May 1, beginning May 1, 2027,
the Advisory Board shall conduct a comprehensive evaluation of family support services in North
Carolina and submit a report of its findings and recommendations to the Joint Legislative
Oversight Committee on Health and Human Services and the Fiscal Research Division. The
evaluation shall be made publicly available on the Department's website and shall include at least
all of the following:
(1) The impact of integrated family support services on family economic stability.
(2) The efficiency and effectiveness of the statewide family support coordination
system developed pursuant to Section 3.1(b) of this act.
(3) Gaps and challenges in State-administered family support programs and
services requiring policy adjustments.

PART VIII. SEVERABILITY
SECTION 8.1. If any section or provision of this act is declared unconstitutional or
invalid by the courts, it does not affect the validity of this act as a whole or any part other than
the part declared to be unconstitutional or invalid.

PART IX. EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 9.1. Except as otherwise provided, this act is effective when it becomes
law.
Page 6 Senate Bill 561-First Edition